Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.020

Right to possession and management of estate.

Every personal representative shall, after having qualified, by giving bond as hereinbefore provided, have a right to the immediate possession of all the real as well as personal estate of the deceased, and may receive the rents and profits of the real estate until the estate shall be settled or delivered over, by order of the court, to the heirs or devisees, and shall keep in tenantable repair all houses, buildings and fixtures thereon, which are under his or her control.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2030; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 94; RRS s 1464; prior: Code 1881 s 1444; 1860 p 189 s 132; 1854 p 278 s 65.]

NOTES:

When title vests: RCW 11.04.250.